California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this section are exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology.

(3) The state is immune from any liability resulting from the implementation of this
 section.

(4) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section without taking any regulatory action.

(h) Notwithstanding Sections 18927 and 11004, the supplemental benefits described in this section are not subject to recovery for an overissuance caused by intentional program violation, fraud, inadvertent household error, or administrative error, and are not subject to review under Section 10950.

(i) The supplemental benefits described in this section are not entitlement benefits, and the department shall provide those benefits pursuant to this section only to the extent that funding is appropriated in the annual
 Budget Act for purposes of this section.

(j) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to establish this pilot project.

(k) This section shall become inoperative on June 30, 2028, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 16.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative June 30, 2028, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [10073. - 10077.]

10073.

Notwithstanding Section 15204.2, the state shall pay 100 percent of the nonfederal share of costs of the electronic benefits transfer system planning, procurement, development, implementation, and conversion. The county shall pay its normal nonfederal costs pursuant to Section 15204.2 for system maintenance and operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 31.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative August 18, 1997, by Sec. 187 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

10075.5.

The state shall be responsible for procuring and contracting for a statewide electronic benefits transfer system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 17.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10075.6.

The Office of Technology and Solutions Integration shall be the project manager of the electronic benefits transfer system, and shall be responsible for system planning, procurement, development, implementation, conversion, maintenance and operations, contract management, and all other activities that are consistent with a state-managed project and a statewide system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 31.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10076.

The director shall promptly seek any federal approvals necessary for implementation of this chapter. Any provision of this chapter whose implementation requires any federal waiver or approval shall become operative 120 days after receipt of the necessary federal waiver or approval, and shall remain operative only for the duration of the federal approval for its implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 31.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative August 18, 1997, by Sec. 187 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

10077.

The State Department of Social Services may adopt regulations to implement this act in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The initial adoption of any emergency regulations by the department to implement this chapter and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. The initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those regulations by the department shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 31.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative August 18, 1997, by Sec. 187 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.5. FISCAL PROVISIONS [10100. - 10104.]

10100.

It is the intent of the Legislature that counties shall continue to provide matching funds for county-administered social services programs as these programs are defined by Sections 12251 and 16501 and other services to be provided in accordance with Section 10102.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any matching requirement established upon each county pursuant to Section 12306.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 91, Sec. 13.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10101.

(a) For the 1991–92 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the state’s share of the costs of the child welfare program shall be 70 percent of the actual nonfederal expenditures for the program or the amount appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose, whichever is less.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 64.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10101.1.

(a) For the 1991–92 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the state’s share of the costs of the county services block grant and the in-home supportive services administration requirements shall be 70 percent of the actual nonfederal expenditures or the amount appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose, whichever is less.

(b) Federal funds received under Title 20 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397 et seq.) and appropriated by the Legislature for the county services block grant and the in-home supportive services administration shall be considered part of the state share of cost and not part of the federal expenditures for this purpose.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions
 (a) and (b), commencing in the 2017–18 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, each county’s share of the nonfederal costs of the county services block grant and the in-home supportive services administration requirements shall be the County IHSS Maintenance of Effort pursuant to Section 12306.16.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 37, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, Sec. 12.   (SB 90)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10101.2.

(a) Prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year the state’s share of the costs for the support and care of former dependent children who have been made wards of related guardians under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360), or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), of Chapter 2 of Part 3, shall be 79 percent of the nonfederal share of the amounts as specified in Sections 11364 and 11387.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year
 thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 65.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10102.

The State Department of Social Services shall establish and maintain a plan whereby costs of county administered social services programs will be effectively controlled within the amount annually appropriated for these services. Each county shall utilize least cost services, provided that the quality of services is maintained. Allocations shall be made to each county and shall be limited by, and determined based upon, an allocation plan developed by the State Department of Social Services and approved by the Department of Finance. In administering the plan, the State Department of Social Services shall not allocate funds to cover county cost overruns which result from county failure to meet requirements of the plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 883.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.

All federal funds under Title IV-B of the Social Security Act, which are appropriated to the state shall be passed on to the counties, except for those reasonable funds needed to finance a required statewide information system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 66.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.5.

(a) Notwithstanding the age restrictions specified in Sections 388, 450, 11253, 11363, 11386, 11403, 11403.2, 11405, and 16120, and subdivisions (r) and (v) of Section 11400, a nonminor dependent, or nonminor former dependent, who has been receiving aid pursuant to any of the programs specified in subdivision (b) between January 1, 2012, and December 31, 2012, and who attains 19 years of age prior to January 1, 2013, or who has been receiving that aid between January 1, 2013, and December 31, 2013, and who attains 20 years of age prior to January 1, 2014, may continue to receive aid under the applicable program up to 21 years of age, provided that the nonminor dependent or nonminor former dependent continues to meet all other applicable eligibility requirements as specified in Section 11403. This section
 shall not apply to nonminors who attain 19 years of age prior to January 1, 2012.

(b) This section applies to nonminors currently receiving aid, as of the effective date of the act that added this section, pursuant to any of the following provisions:

(1) Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(2) Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(3) Article 5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(4) Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4 of Division 9.

(5) Sections 11253 and 11405.

(c) A nonminor who has not continuously received aid pursuant to either paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of this section, or Section 11253 between January 1, 2012, and December 31, 2012, due solely to the fact that he or she attained 19 years of age prior to the effective date of the act that added this section may petition the court for reentry pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388. This section shall not apply to nonminors who attain 19 years of age prior to January 1, 2012. For a nonminor who has not continuously received aid pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), or (4) of subdivision (b) of this section, or Section 11405, due solely to the fact that he or she attained 19 years of age prior to the effective date that added this section, the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, shall develop a process by which these youth may resume benefits. The department shall seek to maximize federal financial
 participation.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, a county shall not be precluded from seeking to draw down federal funding on behalf of eligible nonminor dependents or nonminor former dependents as described in subdivision (a), for whom the county has provided aid using county-only funds, on and after January 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 67.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10104.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that the impacts of the 2011 realignment of child welfare services, foster care, adoptions, and adult protective services programs are identified and evaluated initially and over time. It is further the intent of the Legislature to ensure that information regarding these impacts is publicly available and accessible and can be utilized to support the state’s and counties’ effectiveness in delivering these critical services and supports.

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, and publicly post on the department’s Internet Web site, a summary of
 outcome and expenditure data that allows for monitoring of changes over time.

(c) (1) The report shall be submitted and posted by April 15 of each year and shall contain expenditures for each county for the programs described in clauses (i) to (vii), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (16) of subdivision (f) of Section 30025 of the Government Code.

(2) The report shall also contain the amount of funds each county receives from the Protective Services Growth Special Account created pursuant to Section 30025 of the Government Code, child welfare services social worker caseloads per county, and the number of authorized positions in the local child welfare services agency.

(3) The report shall also include reported expenditures for counties that are participating and making claims under the federal Title IV-E waiver, how those counties are maximizing the utilization of funds, and how close counties are to funding the optimum caseload ratios recommended by the evaluation conducted pursuant to Section 10609.5, also known as the California SB 2030 Study.

(d) The department shall consult with legislative staff and
 stakeholders to develop a reporting format consistent with the Legislature’s desired level of outcome and expenditure reporting detail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   (AB 2015)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.7. The Early Childhood Development Act of 2020 [10200. - 10206.]



  CHAPTER 1. Transfer of Childcare Programs to the State Department of Social Services [10200. - 10206.]

10200.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Early Childhood Development Act of 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 86.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 10201.)
-------------------------------------------

10201.

This chapter shall become operative July 1, 2021.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 86.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10202.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) The state’s system of early learning and care must become more integrated and coordinated to achieve its goals of promoting a high-quality, affordable, early childhood system designed to comprehensively and effectively serve children and families.

(b) Social determinants of health, adverse childhood experiences, quality learning and care for children, and economic and other supports for the needs of families are critical determinants of life outcomes for children, and California’s system of early learning and care must address inequities and
 disproportionalities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 40.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10203.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to launch a phased approach to achieving the goals of the state’s Master Plan for Early Learning and Care, uniting child care programs where they can best be integrated with other child and family focused benefits, programs, and services, and support child care providers and programs while maintaining vital connections to preschool, transitional kindergarten, and K-12 education.

(b) To effectuate this transition, effective July 1, 2021, responsibility for the following programs, responsibilities, services, and systems are hereby transferred from the State Department of Education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction to the State Department of Social Services:

(1) Alternative payment programs pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) of Part 1.8.

(2) Migrant alternative payment programs pursuant to
 Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) of Part 1.8.

(3) CalWORKs Stage 2 child care pursuant to
 Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8.

(4) CalWORKs Stage 3 child care pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8.

(5) General
 child care and development programs pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240) of Part 1.8.

(6) Migrant child care and development programs pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235) Part 1.8.

(7) Child care and development services for children with severe disabilities pursuant to
 Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260) of Part 1.8.

(8) The Child and Adult Care Food Program implemented pursuant to Section 1766 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(9) Child care and development facilities capital outlay pursuant to Chapter 30
 (commencing with Section 10470) of Part 1.8.

(10) Responsibility as the lead agency for administration of the Child Care and Development Fund, as defined in Section 98.2 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and as set forth in Sections 10211 to 10212.5, inclusive.

(11) Responsibility as the lead agency for the Child Care and Development Fund State Plan Early Learning and Care Infrastructure Grant Program pursuant to former Section 8280 of the Education Code.

(12) The Early Learning and Care Workforce Development Grants Program pursuant to Section 10311.

(13) The California Head Start State Collaboration Office funded by collaboration grants awarded pursuant to Section 9837b of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(14) The Early Head Start-Child Care Partnerships Grant from the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(15) Resource and referral agencies pursuant to
 Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10217) of Part 1.8.

(16) Local child care
 and development planning councils pursuant to Chapter 31 (commencing with Section 10480) of Part 1.8.

(17) The California Child Care Initiative Project pursuant to Section 10223.

(18) Other
 child care quality improvement projects.

(19) Any memoranda of understanding and partnerships related to the programs, services, and systems listed in this subdivision.

(20) The Child Development Management Information System and other related data systems as they pertain to the programs, services, and systems listed in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 258.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.   Operative July 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 10201.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.

(a) For purposes of this part, “department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2021, whenever the laws governing the programs, responsibilities, services, or systems listed in subdivision (b) of Section 10203 refer to the “State Department of Education,” “department,” “Superintendent of Public Instruction,” or “Superintendent,” the reference shall be construed to be to the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 86.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 10201.)
-------------------------------------------

10205.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2021, the department succeeds to, and is vested with, all the powers, functions, duties, responsibilities, obligations, liabilities, and jurisdiction of the programs, responsibilities, services, and systems listed in subdivision (b) of Section 10203.

(b) The department may enter into memoranda of understanding or interagency agreements or contracts with the California Health and Human Services Agency, its other departments and offices, the State Department of Education, and any other state agency, department, or office, as necessary to implement this part.

(c) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, any reference to the State Department of Education or the
 Superintendent of Public Instruction in any regulation, contract, or in any other code, with respect to any of the programs, responsibilities, services, or systems listed in subdivision (b) of Section 10203, is a reference to the State Department of Social Services.

(d) Without limiting any other powers or duties, the department shall ensure compliance with the terms of any state plans, memoranda of understanding, administrative orders, interagency agreements, contracts, assurances, single state agency obligations, federal statutes and regulations, and any other form of agreement or obligation that vital government activities rely upon or are a condition to the continued receipt by the department of state or federal funds or services.

(e) All existing regulations relating to programs, responsibilities, services, and systems listed in subdivision (b) of Section 10203 that have been
 adopted by the State Department of Education on or before June 30, 2021, are expressly continued in force, unless they conflict with the act that added this part. Any statute, law, rule, or regulation relating to the programs, responsibilities, services, and systems listed in subdivision (b) of Section 10203 that are in force on June 30, 2020, or that may hereafter be enacted or adopted with reference to this part, shall apply to the department.

(f) A contract, lease, license, state or federal grant, memorandum of understanding, or any other agreement relating to the programs, responsibilities, services, and systems listed in subdivision (b) of Section 10203 to which the State Department of Education is a party is not void or voidable by reason of the act that added this part, but are continued in full force and effect, with the department assuming all of the rights, obligations, and duties of the State Department of Education. The assumption
 by the department does not in any way affect the rights of the parties to the contract, lease, license, state or federal grant, memorandum of understanding, or agreement.

(g) Any legal action concerning the duties, responsibilities, obligations, liabilities, and functions described in this chapter shall not abate, and shall continue in the name of the department. The substitution of the department for the State Department of Education or the Superintendent of Public Instruction does not affect the rights of the parties to the action.

(h) All financial and accounting records, documents, records, and property relating to programs, responsibilities, services, and systems listed in subdivision (b) of Section 10203 shall be transferred to the department by the State Department of Education. The format and timing of this transfer shall be mutually agreed upon by the State Department of
 Social Services and the State Department of Education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and shall not require formal agreement or approval by any other entity.

(i) On or before July 1, 2021, the Governor shall establish the position of Deputy Director of Child Care and Development within the department, as an exempt position, to be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and who holds office at the pleasure of the Governor.

(j) On or before March 31, 2021, the department shall submit to the appropriate budget and policy committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Early Childhood Policy Council, a plan that describes how the
 department will achieve the intent expressed in Section 10203, including a description of activities undertaken by the department up until that date, and specifying all of the following:

(1) How the department intends to make child care programs more integrated.

(2) How the department plans to maintain existing connections or enhance connections to California state preschool programs, transitional kindergarten, and elementary and secondary education.

(3) An estimate of the ongoing cost of the State Department of Social Services for administering
 child care programs. A description of the number of positions that will move to the State Department of Social Services from the State Department of Education and the number of additional positions the State Department of Social Services will need.

(4) How this shift results in better services for children and families, including how this shift will ensure families have the most comprehensive information about their choices in comprehensive supports for their families, including child care.

(5) How the department plans to prevent administrative duplication and regulatory conflict for providers that have contracts for both general
 child care and development programs and California state preschool programs.

(6) How the department plans to maintain the existing provider flexibility to transfer funds across contracts for both general child care and development programs and California state preschool programs.

(7) How the department plans to ensure quality projects support state-supported child care in all settings, including California state preschool programs.

(8) How the California Head Start State Collaboration Office will continue to engage with California state preschool program providers and school districts.

(9) How parents will be provided enhanced information about making an informed child care choice that best meets their child’s and family’s needs, from the full spectrum of quality child care available.

(10) How a cradle-to-career, interagency data system will provide
 improved state-level reporting, support the goals of the Master Plan for Early Learning and Care, and support the achievement of paragraph (9).

(11) Further plans to align activities with recommendations from the Master Plan for Early Learning and Care regarding child care.

(k) From October 1, 2020, to December 31, 2024, inclusive, the department shall submit to the appropriate budget and policy committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Early Childhood Policy Council a quarterly report that describes how the department is making progress on the transition required by this chapter, and how the department is furthering the intent of this
 transition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 259.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.   Operative July 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 10201.)
-------------------------------------------

10206.

(a) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Education may implement, interpret, or make specific this part by means of all-county letters, bulletins, or similar written instructions from either department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations.

(b) Initial regulations developed pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) that are necessary to implement
 Chapter 24 of the Statutes of 2020 (Senate Bill 98 of the 2019–20 Regular Session) shall be adopted by each department no later than December 31, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 62, Sec. 17.   (AB 210)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.8. Child Care and Development Services Act [10207. - 10492.2]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10207. - 10215.]

10207.

The purpose of this part is as follows:

(a) To provide a comprehensive, coordinated, and cost-effective system of child care and development services for children from infancy to 13 years of age and their parents, including a full range of supervision, health, and support services through full- and part-time programs.

(b) To encourage community-level coordination in support of child care and development services.

(c) To provide an environment that is healthy and nurturing for all children in child care and development programs.

(d) To provide the opportunity for
 positive parenting to take place through understanding of human growth and development.

(e) To reduce strain between parent and child in order to prevent abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

(f) To enhance the cognitive development of children, with particular emphasis upon those children who require special assistance, including bilingual capabilities to attain their full potential.

(g) To establish a framework for the expansion of child care and development services.

(h) To empower and encourage parents and families of children who require child care services to take responsibility to review the safety of the child care program or facility and to evaluate the ability of the program or facility to meet the needs of the
 child.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10207.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a) All families have access to child care and development services, through resource and referral services, where appropriate, regardless of ethnic status, cultural background, or special needs. It is further the intent that subsidized child care and development services be provided to persons meeting the eligibility criteria established under this chapter to the extent funding is made available by the Legislature and Congress.

(b) The healthy physical, cognitive, social, and emotional growth and development of children be supported.

(c) Families achieve and maintain their personal,
 social, economic, and emotional stability through an opportunity to attain financial stability through employment, while maximizing growth and development of their children, and enhancing their parenting skills through participation in child care and development programs.

(d) Community-level coordination in support of child care and development services be encouraged.

(e) Families have a choice of programs that allow for maximum involvement in planning, implementation, operation, and evaluation of child care and development programs.

(f) Parents and families be fully informed of their rights and responsibilities to evaluate the quality and safety of child care programs, including, but not limited to, their right to inspect child care licensing files.

(g) Planning for expansion of child care and development programs be based on ongoing local needs assessments.

(h) The department, in providing funding to child care and development agencies, promote a range of services which will allow parents the opportunity to choose the type of care most suited to their needs. The program scope may include the following:

(1) Programs located in centers, family child care homes, or in the child’s own home.

(2) Services provided part-day, full-day, and during nonstandard hours including weekend care, night and shift care, before and after school care, and care during holidays and vacation.

(3) Child care services provided for infants, preschool, and schoolage children.

(i) The department be responsible for the establishment of a public hearing process or other public input process that ensures the participation of those agencies directly affected by a particular section or sections of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10208.

The department shall develop standards for the implementation of quality programs. Indicators of quality shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) A physical environment that is safe and appropriate to the ages of the children and that meets applicable licensing standards.

(b) Program activities and services that are age appropriate and meet the developmental needs of each child.

(c) Program activities and services that meet the cultural and linguistic needs of children and
 families, including, but not limited to, program activities and services that meet the needs of dual language learners for support in the development of their home language and English.

(d) Family and community involvement.

(e) Parent education.

(f) Efficient and effective local program administration.

(g) Staff that possesses the appropriate and required qualifications, experience, training, or a combination thereof. The appropriate staff qualifications shall reflect the diverse
 linguistic and cultural makeup of the children and families in the child care and development program. The use of intergenerational staff shall be encouraged.

(h) Program activities and services that meet the needs of children with exceptional needs and their families.

(i) Support services for children, families, and providers of care.

(j) Resource and referral services.

(k) Alternative payment services.

(l) Provision for nutritional needs of children.

(m) Social services that include, but are not limited to, identification of child and family needs and referral to appropriate agencies.

(n) Health services that include referral of children to appropriate agencies for services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 62, Sec. 18.   (AB 210)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.

(a) On or before June 30, 1999, the State Department of Education, in consultation with the department, shall develop prekindergarten learning development guidelines. The development of these guidelines shall be funded from funds appropriated for this purpose in the Budget Act of 1998. The guidelines shall focus on preparing four- and five-year-old children for kindergarten. The guidelines shall identify appropriate developmental milestones for each age, how to assess where children are in relation to the milestones, and suggested methods for achieving the milestones. In addition, the guidelines shall identify any basic beginning skills needed to prepare children for kindergarten or first grade, and methods for teaching these basic skills. The guidelines shall be articulated with the academic content
 and performance standards adopted by the State Board of Education for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive. The State Department of Education may contract with an appropriate public or private agency to develop the guidelines.

(b) In future expenditure plans for quality improvement activities, the department shall include funding for periodically updating the guidelines consistent with academic and performance standards and relevant research, broadly distributing the guidelines, and providing education, outreach, and training services to implement the guidelines.

(c) Programs funded by the department under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235) and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), shall use the prekindergarten learning development guidelines developed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.5.

(a) The department shall ensure that each contract entered into under this part to provide child care and development services, or to facilitate the provision of those services, provides support to the public school system of this state through the delivery of appropriate educational services to the children served pursuant to the contract.

(b) The department shall ensure that all contracts for child care and development programs include a requirement that each public or private provider maintain a developmental profile to appropriately identify the emotional, social, physical, and cognitive growth of each child served in order to promote the child’s success in the public schools. To the extent possible, the department shall provide a
 developmental profile to all public and private providers using existing profile instruments that are most cost efficient. The provider of any program operated pursuant to a contract under Section 10268.5 shall be responsible for maintaining developmental profiles upon entry through exit from a child development program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.6.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature for general or migrant childcare and development contractors, teachers, and staff to better understand the language and developmental needs of dual language learners enrolled in publicly funded general childcare and development programs or migrant childcare and development programs by identifying them as a dual language learner through a family language instrument and support their needs through a family language and interest interview. The identification of dual language learners will help improve program quality and inform the allocation and use of state and program resources to better support them and their linguistic and developmental needs for success in school and in life.

(b) The Director of Social Services shall develop procedures for general or migrant childcare and development contractors to identify and report data on dual language learners enrolled in a general childcare and development program administered pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240) or a migrant childcare and development program administered pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235). To the maximum extent practicable, the procedures developed by the director shall align to the procedures required for state preschool contractors, as specified in Section 8241.5 of the Education Code.

(c) The procedures developed by the director pursuant to this section to identify dual language learners shall, at a minimum, include both of the following:

(1) (A) The distribution and collection of a completed family language instrument developed by the director from a parent or
 guardian of each child enrolled in a general childcare and development program or migrant childcare and development program no later than upon enrollment. The family language instrument shall, at a minimum, be able to identify which languages the child is exposed to in the child’s home and community environment, and which languages the child demonstrates an understanding of or is able to speak.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a general or migrant childcare and development contractor serving a schoolage child enrolled in a K–12 education program who has been designated by the child’s school district, county office of education, or charter school as an English learner through the state assessment for English language proficiency may use that designation as an English learner to identify the child as a dual language
 learner.

(2) Criteria for general or migrant childcare and development contractors to use to accurately identify dual language learners enrolled in their programs based on the information collected from the family language instrument and criteria for the family language and interest interview.
